Wyoming, session 2026, HB0183.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-13-109(c)(v)(A), (B)(intro), (I),
(C)(intro), (E) and by creating a new subparagraph (H) is
amended to read:

39-13-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(c) Refunds. The following shall apply:

HB0183

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0259
(v) The following shall apply to the property
tax refund program:

(A) On or before the first Monday in June,
upon the filing of an affidavit demonstrating an adequate
showing that the owner person is qualified under
subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, any person may
apply to the county treasurer or department of revenue for
a property tax refund from property taxes paid with any
applicable interest and penalties on or before the first
Monday in June for the preceding calendar year upon his the
person's principal residence including the land upon which
the residence is located. An applicant The person applying
for the refund shall have been a resident of this state for
not less than five (5) years prior to applying for a refund
under this paragraph and the applicable property shall be
occupied by the owner person for not less than nine (9)
months of the applicable tax year. Subject to legislative
appropriation, If the person does not own the applicable
property, the affidavit shall demonstrate that the person
applying for the refund is not delinquent on payment of
rent or any other obligation related to the property. The
affidavit shall include information as required by rule and
HB0183

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0259
regulation on a form approved by the department of revenue.
Any tax refund under this paragraph shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. The tax refund granted shall be
as provided by subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

(B) Gross income as used in this
subparagraph shall be defined by the department through
rules and regulations. Such Gross income shall be verified
by federal income tax returns which shall accompany the
application for refund, if federal income tax returns were
required and filed, or whatever other means necessary as
determined by the department through rules and regulations.
The tax refund for qualifying persons shall be in the form
of a refund of any ad valorem tax due and timely paid by
any person upon the person's principal residence for the
preceding calendar year in the amount specified in this
paragraph. The department shall issue all refunds due under
this paragraph on or before September 30 of the year in
which application is made for the refund. Any person shall
qualify for a refund in the amount specified under this
paragraph if the person's gross income including the total
household income of which the person is a member does not
exceed the greater of one hundred forty-five percent (145%)
HB0183

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0259
of the median gross household income for the applicant's
person's county of residence or the state, as determined
annually by the economic analysis division of the
department of administration and information. Additionally,
unless the person's tax liability is greater than ten
percent (10%) of the person's household income, no person
shall qualify for a refund under this paragraph unless the
person has total household assets as defined by the
department of revenue through rules and regulations of not
to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)
per adult member of the household as adjusted annually by
the statewide average Wyoming cost-of-living index
published by the economic analysis division of the
department of administration and information, excluding the
following:

(I) The value of the home for which
the taxpayer person is seeking a tax refund, if the person
owns the home;

(C) A maximum refund granted under this
paragraph shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of
the applicant's prior year's property tax paid on the
HB0183

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0259
applicable property in the prior year, but in no instance
shall the maximum amount of refund exceed one-half (1/2) of
the median residential property tax liability for the
applicant's person's county of residence as determined
annually by the department of revenue. For a property that
is designed to house more than one (1) family, the maximum
refund for a principal residence shall be determined by
excluding any land upon which the principal residence is
located and then by apportioning the property tax paid on
the property based on the square footage of the applicable
principal residence compared to the total square footage of
the property. The maximum refund calculated under this
subparagraph shall be adjusted as follows, using the
highest applicable percentage determined below, based on
the person's gross income as determined in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph:

(E) The department shall promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to implement this paragraph. The
rules shall provide that not more than one (1) applicant
shall apply for tax relief for the same principal
residence, except that for a property that is designed to
house more than one (1) family there may be one (1)
HB0183

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0259
applicant per designated principal residence on the
property;

(H) The legislature finds that renters of
property pay property taxes through the payment of rent to
the property owner. The rented property would not otherwise
qualify for a property tax refund under this paragraph if
it is not the principal residence of the owner.
Accordingly, a person who rents property as their principal
residence shall be eligible to apply for a property tax
refund under this paragraph to the extent that the person
otherwise meets the requirements of this paragraph.

Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2027.

(END)
HB0183